Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.410

Offering circular—Certain named persons—Filing of written consent required.

If any person who has not signed an application is named in the offering circular as about to become a director, the written consent of this person shall be filed with the director in the form the director prescribes.

[ 1994 c 92 s 391; 1981 c 85 s 81.]